Wyoming, session 2026, HB0175.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) When shareholders of business entities hire
professionals to provide advice in the exercise of their
rights as shareholders, the shareholders reasonably expect
those services to be performed based on a written financial
analysis. The professionals who deviate from that
shareholder expectation should clearly disclose that the
services provided were not provided based on a written
financial analysis;

(ii) There is a particular need for disclosures
for proxy voting advice because proxy voting advice is
often provided for hundreds or thousands of shareholder
votes each year and is typically based on lengthy policies
that contain general statements that do not explain whether
or how any particular recommendation will maximize
financial returns for investors for any business entity or
shareholders;

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(iii) Proxy advisors may not conduct a written
financial analysis before making recommendations to
shareholders despite having proxy voting policies that
state the purpose of the recommendation is to maximize and
protect shareholder value;

(iv) Requiring proxy advisors to provide clear,
factual disclosures when a recommendation is not based on a
written financial analysis is necessary to prevent
fraudulent or deceptive trade practices within this state;

(v) A business entity that is the subject of a
shareholder proposal may have information relevant to
whether the shareholder proposal is in the shareholders'
financial interests, including information regarding the
costs of the proposal. Requiring proxy advisors to provide
notice to the shareholders would allow the shareholders to
help prevent deceptive trade practices associated with
proxy advisors making recommendations that are not based on
a written financial analysis.

Section 2. W.S. 17-33-101 through 17-33-103 are
created to read:
HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336

CHAPTER 33
PROXY ADVISOR TRANSPARENCY ACT

17-33-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
Proxy Advisor Transparency Act."

17-33-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Company" means a publicly-traded for-profit
business entity;

(ii) "Company proposal" means any proposal made
by a company to its shareholders that is included in the
company's proxy statement, including but not limited to
director nominations or elections or any proposal relating
to director nominations or elections, executive
compensation, corporate transactions, corporate structure,
auditor selection or company policy on any subject;
HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336

(iii) "Default recommendation or policy" means a
system, set of rules, principles or guidelines designed to
assist with voting decisions on any company proposal or
proxy proposal;

(iv) "Proxy advisor" means a person who, for
compensation, provides a proxy advisory service;

(v) "Proxy advisory service" means any of the
following services that are provided to any person in this
state or provided in connection with or in relation to a
company:

(A) Advice or recommendations on how to
vote on any matter to be voted on by shareholders of a
company;

(B) Proxy statement research and analysis
regarding any matter to be voted on by shareholders of a
company;

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(C) Development of proxy voting
recommendations or policies, including establishing default
recommendations or policies.

(vi) "Proxy proposal" means any proposal made by
a shareholder of a company that is included in the
company's proxy statement or has been submitted to be
included in the company's proxy statement, including but
not limited to a proposal related to any of the subjects
that could be covered by a company proposal;

(vii) "Shareholder" includes a shareholder,
member, unitholder, limited partner or other equity owner
of a company;

(viii) "Written financial analysis" means a
written document that:

(A) Analyzes the expected short-term and
long-term financial benefits and costs to the company
implementing a company proposal or a proxy proposal;

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(B) Concludes what vote or course of action
is most likely to positively affect shareholder value; and

(C) Explains the methods and processes used
to prepare the written financial analysis, including the
experience and geographic location of the personnel who
formed the recommendation.

17-33-103. Disclosure requirements for proxy
advisors; penalty; civil cause of action.

(a) If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against
company management on a company proposal or a proxy
proposal or makes a default recommendation or policy
involving votes against company management on company
proposals or proxy proposals and the recommendation or
default recommendation or policy is not based on a written
financial analysis, then the proxy advisor shall provide a
disclosure to each shareholder, or other person acting on
behalf of a shareholder, receiving the proxy advisory
service. For any proxy advisory service as defined in W.S.
17-33-102(a)(v)(A) or (B), the proxy advisor shall also
provide the disclosure under this subsection to the board
HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
of directors of each company that is the subject of the
proxy advisory service.

(b) The disclosure required under subsection (a) of
this section shall be provided at the same time and in the
same format as the proxy advisory service and shall, in a
clear and conspicuous manner:

(i) Identify the proxy advisory service that is
being provided to the person receiving the proxy advisory
service;

(ii) Identify the recommendation against company
management on a company proposal or proxy proposal or the
default recommendation or policy involving votes against
company management on company proposals or proxy proposals;

(iii) State that the proxy advisor has made the
recommendation or default recommendation or policy without
doing so based on a written financial analysis that:

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(A) Analyzes the expected short-term and
long-term financial benefits and costs to the company
implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal;

(B) Concludes what vote or course of action
is most likely to positively affect shareholder value; and

(C) Explains the methods and processes used
to prepare the analysis, including the experience and
geographic location of personnel who formed the
recommendation or default recommendation or policy.

(c) Each proxy advisor required to provide a
disclosure under subsection (a) of this section shall
publicly and in a clear and conspicuous manner disclose on
the home page or front page of the proxy advisor's website
that the proxy advisor's proxy advisory services include
recommendations or default recommendations or policies that
are against company management on company proposals or
proxy proposals and that are not based on written financial
analyses that:

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(i) Analyzes the expected short-term and
long-term financial benefits and costs to the company
implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal;

(ii) Concludes what vote or course of action is
most likely to positively affect shareholder value; and

(iii) Explains the methods and processes used to
prepare the analysis, including the experience and
geographic location of personnel who formed the
recommendation or default recommendation or policy.

(d) If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against
company management on a company proposal or a proxy
proposal or makes a default recommendation or policy
involving votes against company management on company
proposals or proxy proposals and the recommendation or
default recommendation or policy is based on a written
financial analysis, then the proxy advisor shall provide a
disclosure to each shareholder, or other person acting on
behalf of a shareholder, receiving the proxy advisory
service. For any proxy advisory service as defined in W.S.
17-33-102(a)(v)(A) or (B), the proxy advisor shall also
HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
provide the disclosure under this subsection to the board
of directors of each company that is the subject of the
proxy advisory service.

(e) The disclosure required under subsection (d) of
this section shall be provided at the same time and in the
same format as the proxy advisory service and shall, in a
clear and conspicuous manner:

(i) Identify the proxy advisory service that is
being provided to the person receiving the proxy advisory
service;

(ii) Identify the recommendation against company
management on a company proposal or proxy proposal or the
default recommendation or policy involving votes against
company management on company proposals or proxy proposals;

(iii) State that the proxy advisor has made the
recommendation or default recommendation or policy based on
a written financial analysis that:

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(A) Analyzes the expected short-term and
long-term financial benefits and costs to the company
implementing the company proposal or proxy proposal;

(B) Concludes what vote or course of action
is most likely to positively affect shareholder value; and

(C) Explains the methods and processes used
to prepare the analysis, including the experience and
geographic location of personnel who formed the
recommendation or default recommendation or policy.

(iv) State that the written financial analysis
is available upon request.

(f) Upon request by any person who received the
disclosure under subsection (d) of this section, a proxy
advisor shall make the written financial analysis available
in electronic form within a reasonable time.

(g) A person who violates this section commits an
unlawful deceptive trade practice under W.S. 40-12-105.

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(h) In addition to enforcement under subsection (g)
of this section, a shareholder, or other person acting on
behalf of a shareholder, who received the proxy advisory
service at issue or a company that is the subject of the
proxy advisory service aggrieved by a violation of this
section may bring a civil cause of action against a proxy
advisor for a declaratory judgment or injunctive relief in
a court of competent jurisdiction. Not later than the
seventh day after the date on which an action is brought
under this subsection, the plaintiff shall provide written
notice by regular mail to the attorney general. The
attorney general may intervene in an action under this
subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to limit any remedy available under the Wyoming Consumer
Protection Act in W.S. 40-12-101 through 40-12-114.

Section 3. W.S. 17-4-412(d) by creating a new
paragraph (xv) and 40-12-105(a) by creating a new paragraph
(xviii) are amended to read:

17-4-412. Denial, revocation, suspension, withdrawal,
restriction, condition, or limitation of registration.

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
(d) A person may be disciplined under subsections (a)
through (c) of this section if the person:

(xv) Has violated W.S. 17-33-103.

40-12-105. Unlawful practices.

(a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice
unlawful under this act when, in the course of his business
and in connection with a consumer transaction, he
knowingly:

(xviii) Violates W.S. 17-33-103.

Section 4. This act shall apply to proxy advisory
services provided by proxy advisors to shareholders on or
after July 1, 2026.

Section 5. The secretary of state shall promulgate
rules as necessary to implement this act.

HB0175

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0336
Section 6.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 5 and 6 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0175